Oklahoma, session 2026, HB3086.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE PEOPLE OF THE STATE OF OKLAHOMA:
SECTION 1. AMENDATORY 57 O.S. 2021, Section 504, is
amended to read as follows:
Section 504. (a) A. The Board shall elect from its members a
chairman chair, vice chairman vice-chair and a secretary. It The
Board shall adopt rules and regulations for its government and may
adopt an official seal for the Department. Members shall be
reimbursed for travel expenses, as provided in the State Travel
Reimbursement Act, while attending meetings of the Board or while
performing other official duties.
(b) B. The Board shall have the following powers and duties:
(1) 1. To establish policies for the operation of the
Department;
(2) 2. To establish and maintain such institutions as are
necessary or convenient for the operation of programs for the
education, training, vocational education, and rehabilitation of
prisoners under the jurisdiction of the Department;

(3) 3. To lease, from time to time, without restriction as to
terms, any property which said Board shall determine advisable to
more fully carry into effect the operation of prison industries;
(4) 4. To acquire, construct, extend, improve, maintain and
operate any and all facilities of all kinds which in the judgment of
the Board shall be necessary or convenient to foster the prison
industries program;
(5) 5. To require the Director and any other personnel of the
Department, when deemed necessary by the Board, to give bond for the
faithful performance of their duties;
(6) 6. To appoint and fix the salary of the Director;
(7) 7. To enter into contracts with private prison contractors;
and
(8) 8. To provide training to employees of private prison
contractors and other governmental entities on a fee basis;
9. To be notified of the annual budget work program of the
Department; and
10. To be notified of the deaths of inmates in the custody of
the Department.
SECTION 2. This act shall become effective November 1, 2026.
ENR. H. B. NO. 3086 Page 2

Passed the House of Representatives the 11th day of March, 2026.
Presiding Officer of the House
of Representatives
Passed the Senate the 28th day of April, 2026.
Presiding Officer of the Senate
OFFICE OF THE GOVERNOR
Received by the Office of the Governor this ____________________
day of ___________________, 20_______, at _______ o'clock _______ M.
By: _________________________________
Approved by the Governor of the State of Oklahoma this _________
day of ___________________, 20_______, at _______ o'clock _______ M.
_________________________________
Governor of the State of Oklahoma
OFFICE OF THE SECRETARY OF STATE
Received by the Office of the Secretary of State this __________
day of ___________________, 20_______, at _______ o'clock _______ M.
By: _________________________________
ENR. H. B. NO. 3086 Page 3